West Virginia, session 2025, SB828.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8B.  SEXUAL OFFENSES. §61-8B-10. Imposition of sexual acts on persons incarcerated, detained, or under supervision; penalties. (a) Any person employed by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, any person working at a correctional or juvenile facility managed by the Commissioner of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to contract, such as a vendor, or as an employee of a state agency or as a volunteer or any person employed by, or acting pursuant to, the authority of any sheriff, county commission, municipality, or court to ensure compliance with the provisions of §62-11B-1 et seq. of this code who engages in sexual intercourse, sexual intrusion, or sexual contact with a person who is incarcerated or detained in this state is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.(b) Any person employed by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation as a parole officer or by the West Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals as an adult or juvenile probation officer, who engages in sexual intercourse, sexual intrusion, or sexual contact with a person said parole officer or probation officer is charged as part of his or her employment with supervising, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.(c) Any person working or volunteering in an alternative sentence program authorized by the provisions of §62-11C-1 et seq. of this code who, as part of his or her employment or volunteer duties, supervises program participants, and engages in sexual intercourse, sexual intrusion, or sexual contact with a program participant is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than one nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.(d) The term "incarcerated or detained in this state" for purposes of this section includes, in addition to its usual meaning, adult offenders serving a sentence or a period of supervision under the provisions of §62-11B-1 et seq. of this code, and juvenile offenders detained, committed, or serving a period of supervision under the provisions of §62-11B-1 et seq. of this code.(e) An authorized pat-down, strip search, or other security-related task does not constitute sexual contact pursuant to this section.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home